Utah statutes.
65A-8-307.   Exemption for emergency or permit.

This part shall not apply to any emergency when heritage trees constitute a danger to life or property, or to any person whose application for alteration or removal of a heritage tree has been granted by the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 136, 2007 General Session

